Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-257
Claims; certified statement; delivered to town clerk.

The board shall make a certificate to be signed by a majority of its members specifying the value of the claim and to whom the amount is allowed, and shall cause such certificate to be delivered to the town clerk of said town, to be by him kept on file for the inspection of all persons.

Laws 1895, c. 28, § 56, p. 147;

R.S.1913, § 1041;

C.S.1922, § 943;

C.S.1929, § 26-257;

R.S.1943, § 23-257;

Laws 1973, LB 75, § 13.